Hawaii, session 2025, HB1497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 45, Session Laws of Hawaii 2018, codified as section 149A-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, requires all users of restricted use pesticides to report annually on their use of restricted use pesticides to the department of agriculture. The legislature further finds that to implement this program, the department should provide users the most efficient and consistent way to report their information.  Thus, all users should be able to report their information and data online to the department. The purpose of this part is to establish and appropriate funds for an online restricted use pesticide reporting system to allow users to report their restricted use pesticide use directly to the department of agriculture. SECTION 2.  The department of agriculture shall develop an online reporting tool for restricted use pesticide reporting pursuant to section 149A-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of agriculture to develop an online reporting tool for restricted use pesticide reporting. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this part. PART II SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to convert full-time equivalent (     FTE) temporary environmental health specialist III positions (position numbers 123035 and 123036) into full-time equivalent (     FTE) permanent environmental health specialist III positions. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this part. PART III SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.